Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 8. Shareholders.
§ 13.1-660.2.
Remote participation in shareholders’ meetings.

Shareholders of any class or series of shares may participate in any meeting of shareholders by means of remote communication to the extent the board of directors authorizes such participation for such class or series. Participation as a shareholder by means of remote communication shall be subject to such guidelines and procedures as the board of directors adopts.

Shareholders participating in a shareholders’ meeting by means of remote communication shall be deemed present and may vote at such a meeting if the corporation has implemented reasonable measures to:

Verify that each person participating remotely as a shareholder is a shareholder or a shareholder’s proxy; and

Provide such shareholders a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting and to vote on matters submitted to the shareholders, including an opportunity to read or hear the proceedings of the meeting, substantially concurrently with such proceedings.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws require the meeting of shareholders to be held at a place, the board of directors may determine that any meeting of shareholders shall not be held at any place and shall instead be held solely by means of remote communication in conformity with subsection B.

History.

2010, c. 782; 2017, c. 646; 2019, c. 734.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 646 inserted “or a shareholder’s proxy” in subdivision B 1; deleted “to communicate, and” preceding “to read” in subdivision B 2; and added subsection C.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, inserted “of shares” following “any class or series” inserted “as a shareholder” following “Participation” and deleted “and shall be in conformity with subsection B” at the end; in subdivision B 1, inserted “as a shareholder”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 39 (2013).

§ 13.1-661.
Shareholders’ list for meeting.

After fixing a record date for a meeting, a corporation shall prepare an alphabetical list of the names of all its shareholders who are entitled to notice of a shareholders’ meeting. If the board of directors fixes a different record date under subsection E of §

13.1-660

to determine the shareholders entitled to vote at the meeting, a corporation also shall prepare an alphabetical list of the names of all its shareholders who are entitled to vote at the meeting. A list shall be arranged by voting group, and within each voting group by class or series of shares, and show the address of and number of shares held by each shareholder. Nothing contained in this subsection shall require the corporation to include on such list the electronic mail address or other electronic contact information of a shareholder.

The shareholders’ list for notice shall be available for inspection by any shareholder, beginning two business days after notice of the meeting is given for which the list was prepared and continuing through the meeting, (i) at the corporation’s principal office or at a place identified in the meeting notice in the county or city where the meeting will be held or (ii) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of the meeting. In the event that the corporation determines to make the list available on an electronic network, the corporation may take reasonable steps to ensure that such information is available only to shareholders of the corporation. A shareholders’ list for voting shall be similarly available for inspection promptly after the record date for voting. The original share transfer books shall be prima facie evidence as to who are the shareholders entitled to examine such list or to vote at any meeting of shareholders. A shareholder, or the shareholder’s agent or attorney, is entitled on written demand to inspect and, subject to the requirements of subsection D of §

13.1-771

, to copy a list, during regular business hours and at the shareholder’s expense, during the period it is available for inspection.

If the meeting is to be held at a place, the corporation shall make the list of shareholders entitled to vote available at the meeting, and any shareholder, or the shareholder’s agent or attorney, is entitled to inspect the list at any time during the meeting or any adjournment. If the meeting is to be held solely by means of remote communication, then such list shall also be open to such inspection during the meeting on a reasonably accessible electronic network, and the information required to access such list shall be provided with the notice of the meeting.

If the corporation refuses to allow a shareholder or the shareholder’s agent or attorney to inspect a shareholders’ list before or at the meeting, or to copy a list as permitted by subsection B, the circuit court of the county or city where the corporation’s principal office, or if none in the Commonwealth its registered office, is located, on application of the shareholder, may summarily order the inspection or copying at the corporation’s expense and may postpone the meeting for which the list was prepared until the inspection or copying is complete.

Refusal or failure to prepare or make available the shareholders’ list does not affect the validity of action taken at the meeting.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-30; 1956, c. 428; 1964, c. 418; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 2010, c. 782; 2012, c. 706; 2017, c. 646; 2019, c. 734; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 rewrote the section.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 706 inserted the
third sentence of subsection B.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 646 substituted “If the meeting is to be held at a place, the” for “The” in subsection C; and inserted “as provided in subsections B and C” in subsection D.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, inserted “voting” preceding “group by,” and added the last sentence; in subsection B, substituted “of” for “set forth in”; in subsection C, deleted “If the meeting is to be held at a place” at the beginning; in subsection D, deleted “the shareholder’s” preceding “attorney,” and deleted “as provided in subsections B and C” preceding “or to copy”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, added “or (ii) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of the meeting. In the event that the corporation determines to make the list available on an electronic network, the corporation may take reasonable steps to ensure that such information is available only to shareholders of the corporation” in subsection B; in subsection C, inserted “If the meeting is to be held at a place” in the first sentence and added the second sentence; and made stylistic changes. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-662.
Voting entitlement of shares.

Except as provided in subsections B, C, D, and E or unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, each outstanding share, regardless of class or series, is entitled to one vote on each matter voted on at a shareholders’ meeting. Only shares are entitled to vote.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, in the election of directors each outstanding share, regardless of class or series, is entitled to one vote for as many persons as there are directors to be elected at that time and for whose election the shareholder has a right to vote.

Redeemable shares are not entitled to vote after delivery of written notice of redemption is effective and a sum sufficient to redeem the shares has been deposited with a bank, trust company, or other financial institution under an irrevocable obligation to pay the holders the redemption price on surrender of the shares.

Shares of a corporation are not entitled to vote if they are owned directly or indirectly through an entity of which a majority of the voting power is held directly or indirectly by the corporation or that is otherwise controlled by the corporation.

If a corporation holds in a fiduciary capacity its own shares directly, or indirectly through an entity of which a majority of the voting power is held directly or indirectly by the corporation or that is otherwise controlled by the corporation, such shares shall not be deemed to be outstanding and entitled to vote unless:

The corporation has authority to vote the shares only in accordance with directions of the principal or beneficiary; or

A co-fiduciary exists, pursuant to §

6.2-1011

or otherwise, in which event the co-fiduciary may vote the shares.

Shares standing in the name of another corporation, domestic or foreign, may be voted by such officers, agent, or proxy as the bylaws of such corporation may prescribe, or, in the absence of such provision, as the board of directors of such corporation may determine.

Shares standing in the name of a partnership may be voted by any partner. Shares standing in the name of a limited liability company may be voted as the articles of organization or an operating agreement may prescribe, or in the absence of any such provision as the managers, or if there are no managers, the members of the limited liability company may determine.

Shares held by three or fewer persons as joint tenants or tenants in common or tenants by the entirety may be voted by any of such persons. If more than one of such tenants votes such shares, the vote shall be divided among them in proportion to the number of such tenants voting.

Shares held by an administrator, executor, guardian, conservator, committee, or curator representing the shareholder may be voted by such person without a transfer of such shares into such person’s name. Shares standing in the name of a trustee may be voted by the trustee, but no trustee is entitled to vote shares held by the trustee without a transfer of such shares into the trustee’s name.

Shares standing in the name of a receiver or a trustee in proceedings under the federal Bankruptcy Reform Act of 1978 may be voted by such person. Shares held by or under the control of a receiver or a trustee in proceedings under the federal Bankruptcy Reform Act of 1978 may be voted by such person without the transfer thereof into such person’s name if authority to do so is contained in an order of the court by which such person was appointed.

Nothing herein contained shall prevent trustees or other fiduciaries holding shares registered in the name of a nominee pursuant to §

6.2-1010

from causing such shares to be voted by such nominee as the trustee or other fiduciary may direct. Such nominee may vote shares as directed by a trustee or other fiduciary without the necessity of transferring the shares to the name of the trustee or other fiduciary.

A shareholder whose shares are pledged is entitled to vote such shares until the shares have been transferred into the name of the pledgee, and thereafter the pledgee is entitled to vote the shares so transferred.

The articles of incorporation may provide that the holders of bonds or debentures shall be entitled to vote on specified matters and such right shall not be terminated except upon consent of the holders of two-thirds in aggregate principal amount.

Subject to the provisions of §

13.1-665

, when shares are held by more than one of the fiduciaries referred to in this section, the shares shall be voted as determined by a majority of such fiduciaries, except that (i) if they are equally divided as to a vote, the vote of the shares is divided equally and (ii) if only one of such fiduciaries is present in person or by proxy at a meeting, the fiduciary shall be entitled to vote all the shares. A proxy apparently executed by one of several of such fiduciaries shall be presumed to be valid until challenged and the burden of proving invalidity shall rest on the challenger.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-192 to 13-198, 13-203, 13.1-32; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 1975, c. 500; 1984, c. 366; 1985, c. 522; 1990, c. 267; 1997, c. 801; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

Editor’s note.

The Bankruptcy Reform Act of 1978, referred to above, is codified, generally, as 11 USCS § 1101 et seq.

Acts 1997, c. 801, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 1998. The powers granted and duties imposed pursuant to this act shall apply prospectively to guardians and conservators appointed by court order entered on or after that date, or modified on or after that date if the court so directs, without regard to when the petition was filed. The procedures specified in this act governing proceedings for appointment of a guardian or conservator or termination or other modification of a guardianship shall apply on and after that date without regard to when the petition therefor was filed or the guardianship or conservatorship created.”

Effective October 1, 2010, “§

6.2-1011

” was substituted for “§ 6.1-31.2” and “§

6.2-1010

” for “§ 6.1-31,” to conform to the recodification of Title 6.1 by Acts 2010, c. 794.

Acts 2019, c. 734, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 5 provides: “That until July 1, 2021, the term ‘conversion,’ when used in any provision of the first enactment of this act, shall be construed to mean ‘entity conversion.’ ”

The 1997 amendment,

effective January 1, 1998, inserted “conservator” preceding “committee or curator” in subsection I.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in subsection C, deleted “Redeemable,” preceding, and inserted “that have been called for redemption” following “Shares” in the first sentence, and substituted “a specified period, not less than two” for “five” in the second sentence; added the last sentence of subsection G; in subsection I, substituted “such person” for “him” following “voted by,” “such person’s” for “his” following “shares into” in the first sentence and “the trustee” for “him” twice and “the trustee’s” for “his” in the second sentence; in subsection J, substituted “such person” for “him” in the first sentence; and substituted “when shares” for “where shares” near the beginning of subsection N.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsections A and B, inserted “or series” following “class”; in subsection A, added the second sentence; rewrote subsections C through E; in subsection H, substituted “three or fewer” for “two or more”; in subsection J, inserted “federal” preceding “Bankruptcy” twice; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article, “The Status of the At-Will Employment Doctrine in Virginia after Bowman v. State Bank of Keysville,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 267 (1986).

§ 13.1-663.
Proxies.

A shareholder may vote the shareholder’s shares in person or by proxy.

A shareholder, or the shareholder’s agent or attorney-in-fact, may appoint a proxy to vote or otherwise act for the shareholder by signing an appointment form or by an electronic transmission. An electronic transmission shall contain or be accompanied by information from which the recipient can determine the date of the transmission and that the transmission was authorized by the sender or the sender’s agent or attorney-in-fact.

An appointment of a proxy is effective when a signed appointment form or an electronic transmission of the appointment is received by the inspectors of election or the officer or agent of the corporation authorized to count votes. An appointment is valid for the term provided in the appointment form and, if no term is provided, is valid for 11 months unless the appointment is irrevocable under subsection D.

An appointment of a proxy is revocable unless the appointment form or electronic transmission states that it is irrevocable and the appointment is coupled with an interest. Appointments coupled with an interest include the appointment of:

A pledgee;

A person who purchased or agreed to purchase the shares;

A creditor of the corporation who extended it credit under terms requiring the appointment;

An employee of the corporation whose employment contract requires the appointment; or

A party to a voting agreement created under §

13.1-671

.

The death or incapacity of the shareholder appointing a proxy does not affect the right of the corporation to accept the proxy’s authority unless notice of the death or incapacity is received by the corporation’s secretary or other officer or agent authorized to count votes before the proxy exercises authority under the appointment.

An appointment made irrevocable under subsection D is revoked when the interest with which it is coupled is extinguished.

Unless it otherwise provides, an appointment made irrevocable under subsection D continues in effect after a transfer of the shares and a transferee takes subject to the appointment, except that a transferee for value of shares subject to an irrevocable appointment may revoke the appointment if the transferee did not know of its existence when acquiring the shares and the existence of the irrevocable appointment was not noted conspicuously on the certificate representing the shares or on the information statement for shares without certificates.

Subject to §

13.1-665

and to any express limitation on the proxy’s authority stated in the appointment form or electronic transmission, a corporation is entitled to accept the proxy’s vote or other action as that of the shareholder making the appointment.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-193 to 13-198, 13-203, 13.1-32; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 1975, c. 500; 1984, c. 366; 1985, c. 522; 1991, c. 405; 2005, c. 765; 2010, c. 782; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 rewrote the section.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 deleted the former second sentence of subsection B, which read: “An electronic transmission shall contain or be accompanied by information from which one can determine that the shareholder, the shareholder’s agent or the shareholder’s attorney-in-fact authorized the transmission.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote subsection B regarding electronic transmission; in subsections C and E, substituted “count” for “tabulate”; in subsection C, substituted “the term” for “11 months unless a longer period is expressly,” and added “and, if no term is provided, is valid for 11 months unless the appointment is irrevocable under subsection D” at the end; in subsection E, inserted “corporation’s” preceding “secretary,” and deleted “his” preceding “authority”; in subsection G, inserted “Unless it otherwise provides, an appointment made irrevocable under subsection D continues in effect after a transfer of the shares and a transferee takes subject to the appointment, except that” at the beginning, and substituted “acquiring” for “the transferee acquired”; and deleted former subsection I, which read: “Any fiduciary who is entitled to vote any shares may vote such shares by proxy”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 1991 survey of business and corporate law, see 25 U. Rich. L. Rev. 627 (1991).

§ 13.1-664.
Shares held by intermediaries and nominees.

A corporation’s board of directors may establish a procedure under which a person on whose behalf shares are registered in the name of an intermediary or nominee may elect to be treated by the corporation as the record shareholder by filing with the corporation’s secretary a beneficial ownership certificate. The terms, conditions, and limitations of this treatment shall be specified in the procedure. To the extent such person is treated under such procedure as having rights or privileges that the record shareholder otherwise would have, the record shareholder shall not have those rights or privileges.

The procedure shall specify:

The types of intermediaries or nominees to which it applies;

The rights or privileges that the corporation recognizes in a person with respect to whom a beneficial ownership certificate is filed;

The manner in which the procedure is selected, which shall include that the beneficial ownership certificate be signed or assented to by or on behalf of the record shareholder and the person on whose behalf the shares are held;

The information that must be provided when the procedure is selected;

The period for which selection of the procedure is effective;

Requirements for notice to the corporation with respect to the arrangement; and

The form and contents of the beneficial ownership certificate.

The procedure may specify any other aspects of the rights and duties that may be included in a beneficial ownership certificate.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2019, c. 734.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote the section.

§ 13.1-664.1.
Inspectors of election.

A public corporation shall, and any other corporation may, appoint one or more inspectors to act at a shareholders’ meeting in connection with determining voting results. Each inspector shall verify in writing that the inspector will faithfully execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of the inspector’s ability. An inspector may be an officer or employee of the corporation. An inspector may appoint or retain other persons to assist the inspector in the performance of the inspector’s duties under subsection B, and may rely on information provided by such persons and other persons, including those appointed to count votes, unless the inspectors believe reliance is unwarranted.

The inspectors shall:

Ascertain the number of shares outstanding and the voting power of each;

Determine the shares represented at a meeting;

Determine the validity of proxy appointments and ballots;

Count all votes; and

Make a written report of the results.

No ballots, proxies, or votes, nor any revocations thereof or changes thereto, may be accepted after the closing of the polls unless the circuit court of the city or county where the corporation’s principal office is located or, if none in the Commonwealth, where its registered office is located, upon application by a shareholder, shall determine otherwise.

In performing their duties, the inspectors may examine (i) the proxy appointment forms or electronic transmissions and any other information provided in accordance with subsection B of §

13.1-663

, (ii) any envelope or related writing submitted with those appointment forms, (iii) any ballots, (iv) any evidence or other information specified in §

13.1-665

, and (v) the relevant books and records of the corporation relating to its shareholders and their entitlement to vote, including any securities position list provided by a depository clearing agency.

The inspectors also may consider other information that they believe is relevant and reliable for the purpose of performing any of the duties assigned to them pursuant to subsection B, including for the purpose of evaluating inconsistent, incomplete, or erroneous information and reconciling information submitted by or on behalf of banks, brokers, their nominees, or similar persons that indicates more votes being cast than a proxy authorized by the record shareholder is entitled to cast. If the inspectors consider other information allowed by this subsection, they shall in their report under subsection B specify the information considered by them, including the purpose or purposes for which the information was considered, the person or persons from whom they obtained the information, when the information was obtained, the means by which the information was obtained, and the basis for the inspectors’ belief that such information is relevant and reliable.

Determinations of law by the inspectors are subject to de novo review by a court in a proceeding under §

13.1-669.1

or other judicial proceeding.

History.

1991, c. 405; 2002, c. 285; 2005, c. 765; 2010, c. 782; 2015, c. 611; 2019, c. 734.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 285 added present subsection E, redesignated former subsection E as present subsection F, and in that subsection
inserted “subsection A through D of” preceding “this subsection.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in the first sentence of subsection A, substituted “A public” for “The” and “and any other corporation may” for “in advance of any meeting of shareholders,” and “of the inspector’s determinations” for “thereof”; in subsection B substituted “inspectors” for “inspector,” and deleted “and ballots” following “count all votes”; deleted the first sentence in subsection C; in subsection D, deleted “and counting” following “the validity,” inserted “and in counting the votes,” substituted “that represent” for “which represent,” “clause (v)” for “subdivision B” and “subsection B” for “this section”; and deleted former subsection F.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 added the last sentence in subsection B; and substituted “subsection B of §

13.1-663

” for “§

13.1-663

B” in subsection D.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, substituted “inspector shall verify” for “inspector, before entering upon the discharge of his duties, shall certify,” substituted “the inspector’s” for “his,” and added the third and fourth sentences; rewrote subsection B; in subsection C, deleted “by the inspectors” following “be accepted”; in subsection D, inserted “or electronic transmissions” preceding “and any other”; in subsection E, inserted “by or” following “submitted,” deleted “the record shareholder to cast or more votes being cast than” preceding “the record”; deleted former subsection G, which read: “If authorized by the board of directors, any shareholder vote to be taken by written ballot may be satisfied by a ballot submitted by electronic transmission by the shareholder or the shareholder’s proxy, provided that any such electronic transmission shall either set forth or be submitted with information from which it can be determined that the electronic transmission was authorized by the shareholder or the shareholder’s proxy. A share that is voted by a ballot submitted by electronic transmission is deemed present at the meeting of shareholders”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 1991 survey of business and corporate law, see 25 U. Rich. L. Rev. 627 (1991).

For 2002 survey of Virginia technology law, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 341 (2002).

§ 13.1-665.
Corporation’s acceptance of votes.

If the name signed on a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment corresponds to the name of a shareholder, the corporation, if acting in good faith, is entitled to accept the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the shareholder.

If the name signed on a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment does not correspond to the name of the shareholder, the corporation, if acting in good faith, is nevertheless entitled to accept the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the shareholder if:

The shareholder is an entity and the name signed purports to be that of an officer or agent of the entity;

The name signed purports to be that of an administrator, executor, guardian, conservator, committee, or curator representing the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of fiduciary status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

The name signed purports to be that of a receiver or trustee in bankruptcy of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of this status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

The name signed purports to be that of a pledgee, beneficial owner, or attorney-in-fact of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence acceptable to the corporation of the signatory’s authority to sign for the shareholder has been presented with respect to the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment; or

Three or fewer persons are the shareholder as co-tenants or fiduciaries and the name signed purports to be the name of at least one of the co-owners and the person signing appears to be acting on behalf of all the co-owners.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions B 2 and B 5, in any case in which the will, trust agreement, or other instrument under which a fiduciary purports to act contains directions for the voting of shares in any corporation, or for the execution and delivery of proxies for the voting thereof, such directions shall be binding upon the fiduciary and upon the corporation if a copy thereof has been furnished to the corporation.

The corporation is entitled to reject a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment if the person authorized to accept or reject such instrument or count votes, acting in good faith, has reasonable basis for doubt about the validity of the signature on it or about the signatory’s authority to sign for the shareholder.

Neither the corporation nor the person authorized to count votes, including an inspector of election under §

13.1-664.1

, that accepts or rejects a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment in good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section or subsection B of §

13.1-663

is liable in damages to the shareholder for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

Corporate action based on the acceptance or rejection of a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment under this section is valid unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise.

If an inspector of election has been appointed under §

13.1-664.1

, the inspector of election also has the authority to request information and make determinations under subsections A, B, C, and D.

If authorized by the board of directors, any shareholder vote to be taken at a shareholders’ meeting may be voted upon by a ballot submitted by electronic transmission by the shareholder or the shareholder’s proxy, provided that any such electronic transmission shall either set forth or be submitted with information from which it can be determined that the electronic transmission was authorized by the shareholder or the shareholder’s proxy. A share that is voted by a ballot submitted by electronic transmission as permitted by this subsection is deemed present at the shareholders’ meeting.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-193 to 13-198, 13-203, 13.1-32; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 1975, c. 500; 1984, c. 366; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2015, c. 611; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “such person” for “he” in subdivision B 3; substituted “subdivisions B 2 and B 5” for “subdivisions 2 and 5 of subsection B of this section” in subsection C; and inserted “or subsection B of §

13.1-663

” in subsection E.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 inserted “ballot” preceding “consent, waiver” throughout the section; substituted “count” for “tabulate” in subsection D; and in subsection E, substituted “Neither the corporation nor the person authorized to count votes, including an inspector under §

13.1-664.1

” for “The corporation and its officer or agent” and “is” for “are not” preceding “liable.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision B 1, deleted “partner” following “officer”; in subdivision B 2, inserted “committee, or curator” following “conservator”; in subdivision B 3, inserted “of this status” following “evidence,” and deleted “that such receiver or trustee has been authorized to vote the shares in an order of the court by which such person was appointed” following “the corporation”; in subdivision B 5, substituted “Three or fewer” for “Two or more,” inserted “co-tenants or” following “shareholder as,” and substituted “co-owners” for “fiduciaries” twice; in subsection D, substituted “person authorized to accept or reject such instrument or count” for “secretary or other officer or agent authorized to count”; in subsection E, inserted “of election” following “an inspector”; added subsections G and H; and made stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-666.
Quorum and voting requirements for voting groups.

Shares entitled to vote as a separate voting group may take action at a meeting only if a quorum of those shares exists for the meeting. Unless the articles of incorporation or this chapter provides otherwise, shares representing a majority of the votes entitled to be cast at the meeting by the voting group constitutes a quorum of that voting group for the meeting. Whenever this chapter requires a particular quorum for a specified action, the articles of incorporation may not provide for a lower quorum. Less than a quorum may adjourn a meeting.

Once a share is represented for any purpose at a meeting, it is deemed present for quorum purposes for the remainder of the meeting and for any adjournment of that meeting unless a new record date is or shall be set for that adjourned meeting.

If a quorum exists, action on a matter, other than the election of directors, by a voting group is approved if the votes cast within the voting group favoring the action exceed the votes cast opposing the action, unless the articles of incorporation or this chapter requires a greater number of affirmative votes. An abstention or an election by a shareholder not to vote on the action because of the failure to receive voting instructions from the beneficial owner of the shares shall not be considered a vote cast.

An amendment of the articles of incorporation adding, changing, or deleting a quorum or voting requirement for a voting group greater than specified in subsection A or C is governed by section §

13.1-668

.

The election of directors is governed by §

13.1-669

.

Whenever a provision of this chapter provides for voting of classes or series of shares as separate voting groups, the rules provided in subsection C of §

13.1-708

for amendments of the articles of incorporation apply to that provision.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-31; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 165; 2019, c. 734.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165 added the last sentence of subsection C.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, deleted “on a matter” following “take action,” substituted “for the meeting” for “with respect to that matter,” inserted “shares representing” preceding “a majority,” substituted “cast at the meeting” for “cast on the matter,” substituted “the meeting” for “action on that matter,” and added the last two sentences; rewrote subsection D, which read: “Less than a quorum may adjourn a meeting”; added subsection F; and made stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-667.
Action by single and multiple voting groups.

If the articles of incorporation or this chapter provides for voting by a single voting group on a matter, action on that matter is taken when voted upon by that voting group as provided in §

13.1-666

.

If the articles of incorporation or this chapter provides for voting by two or more voting groups on a matter, action on that matter is taken only when voted upon by each of those voting groups counted separately as provided in §

13.1-666

. Action may be taken by different voting groups on a matter at different times.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2019, c. 734.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, substituted “13.1-666” for “13.1-665”; and in subsection B, substituted “different voting groups on a matter at different times” for “one voting group on a matter even though no action is taken by another voting group entitled to vote on the matter.”

§ 13.1-668.
Modifying quorum or voting requirements.

The articles of incorporation may provide for (i) a lesser or greater quorum requirement for shareholders or voting groups of shareholders, but in each case not less than one third of the shares eligible to vote or (ii) a greater voting requirement for shareholders, or voting groups of shareholders, than is provided by this chapter.

An amendment of the articles of incorporation that adds, changes, or deletes a quorum or voting requirement shall meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same vote and voting groups required to take action under the quorum and voting requirements then in effect.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-33; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 321; 2019, c. 734.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, substituted “shareholders or voting groups of shareholders, but in each case not” for “shareholders, but not,” and deleted “or voting groups of shareholders” following “to vote”; in subsection B, inserted “same” preceding both “quorum” and “vote”; and made stylistic changes.